Utah statutes.
31A-22-405.   Misstated age or gender.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), if the age or gender of the person whose life is at risk is misstated in an application for a policy of life insurance, and the error is not adjusted during the person's lifetime, the amount payable under the policy is what the premium paid would have purchased if the age or gender had been stated correctly.

(2)  If the person whose life is at risk was, at the time the insurance was applied for, beyond the maximum age limit designated by the insurer, the insurer shall refund at least the amount of the premiums collected under the policy.



Amended by Chapter 308, 2002 General Session

